Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1132
Treatment needs of subject; rights of subject or subject's guardian.

Jurisdiction of the court under the Developmental Disabilities Court-Ordered Custody Act does not prohibit a subject or a subject's guardian from consenting to medical care or to a more restrictive setting, on a temporary basis, than that ordered by the court to satisfy the treatment needs of the subject.

Laws 2005, LB 206, § 32.